California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
It is the intent of the Legislature that each permit or wood receipt shall be valid for the least period of time possible in which to accomplish the authorized purpose.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70682 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 78.)
-------------------------------------------

80114.

No person shall knowingly make any false statement on any application for permits, wood receipts, or tags and seals. The application shall contain all of the following information:

(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the applicant.

(b) The amount and species of native plants to be transported.

(c) The name of the county from which the native plants are to be removed.

(d) A description sufficient to identify the real property from which the native plants are to be removed, and such other information or documents as the issuing agency may require to identify the general boundaries of the property.

(e) The name, address, and telephone number of each landowner from whose property the native plants are to be removed.

(f) The applicant’s timber operator permit number, if the harvesting of the native plants is subject to the Z’berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973 (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511) of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code).

(g) The proposed date or dates of the transportation.

(h) The location of the office of the peace officer who will validate the tag or tags.

(i) The destination of the native plants.

(j) The ultimate use of the native plants, such as for use as landscaping or decorative material, or for use as a raw material in the manufacture or processing of a product.

(k) Make, model, and license number of the transportation vehicle.

(l) Such other information as may be required by the agency issuing the permit.

Every applicant shall, at the time of making the application, show his or her proof of ownership of the native plants. The application forms, tags, seals, and wood receipts shall be produced by the department, and distributed to the commissioner of each county subject to Section 80003.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70683.1 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

80115.

Any permit issued pursuant to Section 80111, 80112, 80113, or 80114 shall expire when the tags and seals issued therewith have been attached to the plants covered by the permit and the plants are no longer in the possession of the permittee.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70684 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 80.)
-------------------------------------------

80116.

The director or commissioner may establish specific cutting, harvesting, and plant care criteria which shall include the most favorable and practical horticultural methods and seasons to assure the survivability of the plants and to assure compliance with existing local, state, and federal regulations.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70685 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

80117.

This division does not prevent any of the following:

(a) The clearing of land for agricultural purposes, fire control measures, or required mining assessment work pursuant to federal or state mining laws.

(b) The holding of a recreational event sanctioned by the Bureau of Land Management.

(c) The clearing or removal of native plants from a canal, lateral ditch, survey line, building site, or road or other right-of-way by the landowner or his or her agent, if the native plants are not to be transported from the land or offered for sale and if the commissioner is given at least 10 days’ notice of any such activity.

 This division does not apply to a public agency or to a publicly or privately owned public utility when acting in the performance of its obligation to provide service to the public. This section does not prevent the landowner or his or her agent from complying with any other federal, state, or local laws or regulations.

The commissioner may exempt the use of dead and down wood for camping or branding fires from the requirements of this division.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70686 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

80118.

Except as provided in Section 80072, no provision of this division prohibits any person from harvesting or possessing, for purposes other than resale, five or fewer native plants or from cutting, removing, harvesting, transporting, or possessing, for purposes other than resale, any dead mesquite or palo verde in amounts less than one cord, from land owned by the person, or from land leased by the person when the landowner’s written permission to harvest has been obtained and is exhibited, or from land not owned by the person when the person exhibits written permission to harvest from the landowner. The written permission shall not be valid unless it includes a description of the land satisfying the requirements of Section 80114 and the address and telephone number of the landowner.

Persons harvesting five or fewer native plants, for purposes other than resale, and persons cutting, removing, harvesting, transporting, or possessing any dead mesquite or palo verde, for purposes other than resale, in amounts less than one cord shall not be required to obtain and exhibit any permits, tags and seals, or wood receipts.

Persons possessing six or more harvested native plants shall obtain and exhibit a tag and seal for the sixth native plant and for each additional native plant in his or her possession.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70687 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

80119.

Each county may enact ordinances not inconsistent with this division to control commercial harvesting in that county.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70688 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 84.)
-------------------------------------------

80120.

The issuing agency shall collect fees for the issuance of permits, tags and seals and wood receipts under this division, except from a landowner moving native plants from one of his or her properties to another, if the plants are not to be offered for sale.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70689 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 85.)
-------------------------------------------

80121.

Any harvested native plant listed in Section 80072 or 80073, or added by the director pursuant to Section 80074, which is not exempt from the permit requirements of this division pursuant to Section 80118, found without a tag and seal securely and properly affixed thereto or for which the owner does not exhibit a tag and seal, or any mesquite or palo verde wood in the amount of one cord or more found in the possession of a person without a wood receipt, may be confiscated as evidence of a violation.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70690 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 86.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Shipment of Plants [80151. - 80152.]

80151.

No person or common carrier shall transport, or receive or possess for transportation, any native plant or any wood, or part thereof, except its fruit or manufactured wood articles, that requires a permit, wood receipt, or tag and seal, unless the person offering the plant for shipment furnishes to the person or common carrier a valid permit therefor, and any required wood receipts, and has securely and properly attached thereto any required tag and seal. If for transportation outside of the state, the plant shall also bear a certificate of inspection by the department.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70700 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 87.)
-------------------------------------------

80152.

All native plant species or varieties subject to this division, when not grown in California and imported into this state, shall be declared at a California agricultural inspection station or an office of the department, and proceed to destination under quarantine orders issued by agents of the department employed at the station or office. Any person transporting any plant species or varieties subject to this division from outside the state into California shall have in his or her possession a valid bill of sale for those native plants, and such permits and tags as may be required by the state of origin, and shall produce the bill of sale as well as any permits and tags for inspection by any duly authorized person as described in this division or any peace officer of the state as a requirement for entry into the state of the native plants.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70701 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Enforcement [80171. - 80175.]

80171.

A peace officer may, in the enforcement of this division, make arrests without warrant for a violation of this division which he or she may witness, and may confiscate native plants, or parts thereof when unlawfully harvested, transported, possessed, sold, or otherwise obtained in violation of this division.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70720 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

80172.

A person violating any provision of this division is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), for each violation or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or both, and each violation constitutes a separate offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 421, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

80173.

Upon conviction of a violation of this division, all permits issued to the person convicted shall be revoked and the permittee shall be required to surrender any unused tags and seals or wood receipts to the issuing agency and no new or additional permits shall be issued to the permittee for a period of one year from the date of conviction.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70722 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 91.)
-------------------------------------------

80174.

A second conviction shall be punishable by a fine of not less than three hundred dollars ($300), nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), for each violation, by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by both that fine and imprisonment, and each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Upon the second conviction, all permits issued to the person convicted shall be revoked and the permittee shall be required to surrender any unused tags and seals or wood receipts to the issuing agency and no new or additional permits shall be issued to the permittee at any time in the future from the date of
 conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 123.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

80175.

The issuing agency may revoke any permit, tags, or seals issued for the purpose of harvesting for ultimate replanting if the permittee willfully fails to comply with all of the conditions or stipulations of the permit.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70724 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 93.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Financial Provisions [80201. - 80201.]

80201.

All fees or moneys collected under this division shall be paid into the general fund of the county in which the permits, tags and seals, and wood receipts were issued.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70740 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 94.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 24. INDUSTRIAL HEMP [81000. - 81015.]

81000.

Definitions.

(a) For purposes of this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Approved state plan” means a state plan for California that is approved pursuant to Section 297B of the federal Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 (added by Section 10113 of the federal Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 (Public Law 115-334)) and in effect.

(2) “Board” means the Industrial Hemp Advisory Board.

(3) “Cultivar” means a variety of industrial hemp.

(4) “Disposal” has the same meaning as defined in Section 990.1 of Title
 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(5) “Established agricultural research institution” means an institution that is either of the following:

(A) A public or private institution or organization that maintains land or facilities for agricultural research, including colleges, universities, agricultural research centers, and conservation research centers.

(B) An institution of higher education, as defined in Section 101 of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1001), that grows, cultivates, or manufactures industrial hemp for purposes of research conducted under an agricultural pilot program or other agricultural or academic research.

(6) “Hemp breeder” means an individual or a public or private institution or organization that is
 registered with the commissioner to develop cultivars intended for sale or research.

(7) “Industrial hemp” or “hemp” means an agricultural product, whether growing or not, that is limited to types of the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the seeds of the plant and all derivatives, extracts, the resin extracted from any part of the plant, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of no more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis.

(8) “Industrial hemp program” means growth of industrial hemp pursuant to this division and, if in effect, an approved state plan.

(9) “Measurement of uncertainty” means the parameter associated with the result of a measurement that characterizes the dispersion of the values that could reasonably
 be attributed to the particular quantity subject to measurement.

(10) “Premises” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (ap) of Section 26001 of the Business and Professions Code.

(11) “THC” means delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol.

(12) “Variety development plan” means a strategy devised by a hemp breeder, or applicant hemp breeder, detailing their planned approach to growing and developing a new cultivar for industrial hemp.

(b) This section shall remain operative only until the date on which a state plan for California is approved pursuant to Section 297B of the federal Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 (added by Section 10113 of the federal Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 (Public Law 115-334)), and as of January 1 of the following year is
 repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 838, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 485, Sec. 1.   (SB 292)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed on the date prescribed by its own provisions.    See later operative version amended by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 485.)
-------------------------------------------

81000.

Definitions.

(a) For purposes of this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Approved state plan” means a state plan for California that is approved pursuant to Section 297B of the federal Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 (added by Section 10113 of the federal Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 (Public Law 115-334)) and in effect.

(2) “Board” means the Industrial Hemp Advisory Board.

(3) “Cultivar” means a variety of industrial hemp.

(4) “Disposal” has the same meaning as defined in Section 990.1 of Title
 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(5) “Established agricultural research institution” means an institution of higher education, as defined in Section 101 of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1001), that grows, cultivates, or manufactures industrial hemp for purposes of agricultural or academic research.

(6) “Hemp breeder” means an individual or a public or private institution or organization that is registered with the commissioner to develop cultivars intended for sale or research.

(7) “Industrial hemp” or “hemp” means an agricultural product, whether growing or not, that is limited to types of the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the seeds of the plant and all derivatives, extracts, the resin extracted from any part of the plant, cannabinoids, isomers, acids,
 salts, and salts of isomers, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of no more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis.

(8) “Industrial hemp program” means growth of industrial hemp pursuant to this division and, if in effect, an approved state plan.

(9) “Measurement of uncertainty” means the parameter associated with the result of a measurement that characterizes the dispersion of the values that could reasonably be attributed to the particular quantity subject to measurement.

(10) “Premises” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (ap) of Section 26001 of the Business and Professions Code.

(11) “Research plan” means a strategy devised by an established agricultural research institution, or applicant established agricultural research
 institution, detailing its planned approach to growing or cultivating hemp for academic or agricultural research.

(12) “THC” means delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol.

(13) “Variety development plan” means a strategy devised by a hemp breeder, or applicant hemp breeder, detailing their planned approach to growing and developing a new cultivar for industrial hemp.

(b) This section shall become operative as of the date on which a state plan for California is approved pursuant to Section 297B of the federal Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 (added by Section 10113 of the federal Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 (Public Law 115-334)).

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 838, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (SB 292)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative on the date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

81001.

(a) There is in the department an Industrial Hemp Advisory Board. The board shall consist of 13 members, appointed by the secretary as follows:

(1) Six of the board members shall be growers of industrial hemp that are registered pursuant to the provisions of this division.

(2) Two of the board members shall be members of an established agricultural research institution.

(3) One member of the board shall be a representative as provided by the California State Sheriffs’ Association and approved by the secretary.

(4) One member of the board shall be a county agricultural
 commissioner.

(5) Two members of the board shall be representatives of businesses that sell industrial hemp products.

(6) One member of the board shall be a member of the public.

(b) It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that growers and representatives of industrial hemp product manufacturers and businesses appointed to the board pursuant to this division are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry, and that the representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that persons who are appointed to the board shall be subject to the conflict-of-interest provisions described in Sections 87100 and 87103 of the Government Code.

(c) The term of office for a member of the board is three years. If a vacancy exists, the secretary shall, consistent with the membership requirements described in subdivision (a), appoint a replacement member to the board for the duration of the term.

(d) A member of the board shall not receive a salary but may be reimbursed by the department for attendance at meetings and other board activities authorized by the board and approved by the secretary.

(e) The board shall advise the secretary and may make recommendations on all matters pertaining to this division, including, but not limited to, industrial hemp seed law and regulations, enforcement, annual budgets required to accomplish the purposes of this division, and the setting of an appropriate assessment rate necessary for the administration of this division.

(f) The board shall annually elect a chair from its membership and, from time to time, other officers as it deems necessary.

(g) The board shall meet at the call of its chair or the secretary, or at the request of any four members of the board. The board shall meet at least once a year to review budget proposals and fiscal matters related to the proposals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 485, Sec. 3.   (SB 292)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

81002.

(a) Except when grown by a registered established agricultural research institution or by a registered hemp breeder developing a new cultivar, industrial hemp shall be grown only if it is on the list of approved cultivars, or produced by clonal propagation of industrial hemp that is on the list of approved cultivars.

(b) The list of approved cultivars shall include all of the following:

(1) Industrial hemp cultivars that have been certified by member organizations of the Association of Official Seed Certifying Agencies, including, but not limited to, the Canadian Seed Growers’ Association.

(2) Industrial hemp cultivars that have been
 certified by the Organization of Economic Cooperation and Development.

(3) California varieties of industrial hemp cultivars that have been certified by a seed-certifying agency pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 52401) of Chapter 2 of Division 18.

(c) (1) Upon recommendation by the board or the department, the secretary may update the list of approved cultivars by adding, amending, or removing cultivars.

(2) The adoption, amendment, or repeal of the list of approved cultivars, and the adoption of a methodology and procedure to add, amend, or remove a cultivar from the list of approved cultivars, pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code).

(3) The department, in consultation with the board, shall hold at least one public hearing with public comment to determine the methodology and procedure by which a cultivar is added, amended, or removed from the list of approved cultivars.

(4) The department shall finalize the methodology and procedure to add, amend, or remove a cultivar from the list of approved cultivars and send the methodology and procedure to the Office of Administrative Law. The Office of Administrative Law shall file the methodology and procedure promptly with the Secretary of State without further review pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 11349) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The methodology and procedure shall do all of the following:

(A) Indicate that the methodology
 and procedure are adopted pursuant to this division.

(B) State that the methodology and procedure are being transmitted for filing.

(C) Request that the Office of Administrative Law publish a notice of the filing of the methodology and procedure and print an appropriate reference in Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) The department, in consultation with the board, may determine the manner in which the public is given notice of the list of approved cultivars, and any addition, amendment, or removal from that list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 485, Sec. 4.   (SB 292)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

81003.

(a) (1) Except for an established agricultural research institution subject to Section 81004.5 or a hemp breeder subject to Section 81004, and before cultivation, a grower of industrial hemp shall register with the commissioner of the county in which the grower intends to engage in industrial hemp cultivation.

(2) The application shall include all of the following:

(A) The name, physical address, and mailing address of the applicant.

(B) The legal description, Global Positioning System coordinates, and map of the land area on which the applicant plans to engage in industrial hemp cultivation, storage, or both.

(C) The approved cultivar to be grown, including the state or country of origin.

(3) The application shall be accompanied by a registration fee, as determined pursuant to Section 81005.

(4) A registration issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for one year, after which the registrant shall renew the registration and pay an accompanying renewal fee, as determined pursuant to Section 81005.

(b) If the commissioner determines that the requirements for registration pursuant to this division are met and that the applicant is eligible to participate in the industrial hemp program, in accordance with Sections 81012 to 81014, inclusive, the commissioner shall issue a registration to the applicant.

(c) A registrant that wishes to change or alter the land area on which the registrant conducts industrial hemp cultivation or storage, or both, shall, before any alteration or change, submit to the commissioner an updated registration with the legal description, Global Positioning System coordinates, and map specifying the proposed land change or alteration. Once the commissioner has received the change to the registration and the commissioner determines that the requirements pursuant to this division are met, the commissioner shall notify the registrant that it may cultivate industrial hemp on the changed or altered land area.

(d) A registrant that wishes to change the cultivar grown shall submit to the commissioner the name of the new, approved cultivar to be grown. Once the commissioner has received the change to the registration and the commissioner determines that the requirements pursuant to this division are met, the
 commissioner shall notify the registrant that it may cultivate the new cultivar.

(e) (1) The commissioner shall transmit information collected under this section to the department no more than 10 business days after the date on which it is collected or the date of a change in registration status occurred.

(2) The department shall submit the information described in paragraph (a) of Section 990.70 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations to the United States Department of Agriculture no more than 30 business days after the date on which it is collected or the date of a change in registration status occurred.

(f) The department and the commissioner shall retain information collected under this section for at least three years after collecting or receiving
 it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 485, Sec. 5.   (SB 292)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

81004.

(a) (1) Except when grown by an established agricultural research institution subject to Section 81004.5, and before cultivation, a hemp breeder shall register with the commissioner of the county in which the hemp breeder intends to engage in industrial hemp cultivation.

(2) The application shall include all of the following:

(A) The name, physical address, and mailing address of the applicant.

(B) The legal description, Global Positioning System coordinates, and map of the land area on which the applicant plans to engage in industrial hemp cultivation, storage, or both.

(C) A variety development plan, which shall include all of the following:

(i) If a new cultivar is to be certified by a seed-certifying agency, the name of the seed-certifying agency that will be conducting the certification.

(ii) The industrial hemp varieties that will be used and, if applicable, how those varieties will be used in the development of a new cultivar.

(iii) A plan for testing a representative sample of the plants grown.

(iv) The measures that will be taken to destroy or dispose of any plants with THC concentrations that test above 0.3 percent.

(v) The measures that will be taken to prevent the unlawful use of
 industrial hemp under this division.

(vi) A procedure for the maintenance of records documenting the development of the new cultivar.

(3) The application shall be accompanied by a registration fee, as determined pursuant to Section 81005.

(4) A registration issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for one year, after which the registrant shall renew its registration and pay an accompanying renewal fee, as determined pursuant to Section 81005.

(b) If the commissioner determines that the requirements for registration pursuant to this division are met and that the applicant is eligible to participate in the industrial hemp program, in accordance with Sections 81012 to 81014, inclusive, the commissioner shall issue a hemp breeder registration to the
 applicant.

(c) A registrant that wishes to change or alter the land area on which the registrant conducts industrial hemp cultivation or storage, or both, shall, before any alteration or change, submit to the commissioner an updated registration with the legal description, Global Positioning System coordinates, and map specifying the proposed land change or alteration. Once the commissioner has received the change to the registration and the commissioner determines that the requirements pursuant to this division are met, the commissioner shall notify the registrant that it may cultivate industrial hemp on the changed or altered land area.

(d) A registrant that wishes to change the cultivar grown shall submit to the commissioner the name of the new, approved cultivar to be grown. Once the commissioner has received the change to the registration and the commissioner determines that
 the requirements pursuant to this division are met, the commissioner shall notify the registrant that it may cultivate the new cultivar.

(e) A registrant developing a new cultivar who wishes to change any provision of the variety development plan shall submit to the commissioner the revised variety development plan. Once the commissioner has received the change to the registration and the commissioner determines that the requirements pursuant to this division are met, the commissioner shall notify the registrant that the registrant may cultivate under the revised variety development plan.

(f) All records pertaining to the variety development plan shall be kept and maintained by the hemp breeder and be available upon request by the commissioner, a law enforcement agency, or a seed certifying agency.

(g) (1) The commissioner shall transmit information collected under this section to the department no more than 10 business days after the date on which it is collected or the date of a change in registration status occurred.

(2) The department shall submit the information described in paragraph (a) of Section 990.70 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations to the United States Department of Agriculture no more than 30 business days after the date on which it is collected or the date of a change in registration status occurred.

(h) The department and the commissioner shall retain information collected under this section for at least three years after collecting or receiving it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 485, Sec. 6.   (SB 292)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

81004.5.

(a) (1) Before cultivating hemp for agricultural or academic research, an established agricultural research institution shall register with the commissioner of the county in which it intends to cultivate.

(2) The registration application shall include all of the following:

(A) The name, physical address, and mailing address of the applicant.

(B) The legal description, Global Positioning System coordinates, and map of the geographic area where the applicant plans to engage in hemp cultivation or storage, or both.

(C) A research plan that shall include
 all of the following:

(i) The hemp varieties that will be used and, if applicable, how those varieties will be used for purposes of agricultural or academic research.

(ii) A plan for testing a representative sample of the plants cultivated.

(iii) The measures that will be taken to destroy or dispose of any plants with THC concentrations that test above 0.3 percent.

(iv) A procedure for the maintenance of records documenting the agricultural or academic research.

(3) A registration issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for one year, after which the registrant shall renew its registration if it will continue cultivating hemp beyond that term.

(b) If the commissioner determines that the requirements for registration pursuant to this division are met and that the applicant is eligible to participate in the hemp program, in accordance with Sections 81012 to 81014, inclusive, the commissioner shall issue an established agricultural research institution registration to the applicant.

(c) A registrant that wishes to change or alter the land area on which the registrant conducts hemp cultivation or storage, or both, shall, before any alteration or change, submit to the commissioner an updated registration with the legal description, Global Positioning System coordinates, and map specifying the proposed land change or alteration. Once the commissioner has received the change to the registration and the commissioner determines that the requirements pursuant to this division are met, the commissioner shall notify the registrant
 that it may cultivate hemp on the changed or altered land area.

(d) A registrant conducting agricultural or academic research who wishes to change any provision of the research plan shall submit to the commissioner a revised research plan. Once the commissioner has received the revised research plan, and the commissioner determines that the requirements of this division are met, the commissioner shall notify the registrant that it may cultivate under the revised research plan.

(e) All records pertaining to the research plan shall be kept and maintained by the established agricultural research institution and be available upon request by the commissioner or a law enforcement agency.

(f) (1) The commissioner shall transmit information collected under this section to the department no more than 10
 business days after the date on which it is collected or the date of a change in registration status occurred.

(2) The department shall submit the information described in paragraph (a) of Section 990.70 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations to the United States Department of Agriculture no more than 30 business days after the date on which it is collected or the date of a change in registration status occurred.

(g) The department and the commissioner shall retain information collected under this section for at least three years after collecting or receiving it.

(h) This section shall become operative as of the date on which a state plan for California is approved pursuant to Section 297B of the federal Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 (added by Section 10113 of the federal Agriculture Improvement Act of
 2018 (Public Law 115-334)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 485, Sec. 7.   (SB 292)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative on the date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

81004.6.

Each registered established agricultural research institution, registered grower of industrial hemp, and registered hemp breeder shall report on its hemp production in the state and any changes to the location where it will produce hemp to the Farm Service Agency of the United States Department of Agriculture and shall provide, at minimum, all of the following information:

(a) Street address and, to the extent practicable, geospatial location of the lot, parcel, greenhouse, building, or site of all locations in the state where hemp will be produced.

(b) The acreage dedicated to the production of hemp, or greenhouse or indoor square footage dedicated to the production of hemp, for each location in the
 state where hemp will be produced.

(c) The license or registration number associated with each location in the state where hemp will be produced.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 485, Sec. 8.   (SB 292)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

81005.

(a) The department shall establish a registration fee and appropriate renewal fee to be paid by growers of industrial hemp and hemp breeders, not including an established agricultural research institution, to cover the actual costs of implementing, administering, and enforcing the provisions of this division.

(b) Fees established pursuant to subdivision (a) that are collected by the commissioners upon registration or renewal pursuant to Section 81003 or 81004, except for amounts retained pursuant to this subdivision, shall be forwarded, according to procedures set by the department, to the department for deposit into the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund to be used for the administration
 and enforcement of this division. A commissioner or the county, as appropriate, may retain the amount of a fee necessary to reimburse direct costs incurred by the commissioner in the collection of the fee.

(c) The board of supervisors of a county may establish a reasonable fee, in an amount necessary to cover the actual costs of the commissioner and the county of implementing, administering, and enforcing the provisions of this division, except for costs that are otherwise reimbursed pursuant to subdivision (b), to be charged and collected by the commissioner upon registrations or renewals required pursuant to Section 81003 or 81004 and retained by the commissioner or the county, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 838, Sec. 9.   (SB 153)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

81006.

Industrial Hemp Growth Limitations; Prohibitions; Imports; Laboratory Testing.

(a) Except when grown by a registered established agricultural research institution or a registered hemp breeder, industrial hemp shall be grown in acreages of not less than one-tenth of an acre at the same time.

(b) Clandestine cultivation of industrial hemp is prohibited. All plots shall have adequate signage indicating they are industrial hemp.

(c) Industrial hemp shall not be cultivated on a premises licensed by the Department of Cannabis Control to cultivate or process cannabis. Industrial hemp, regardless of its THC content, that is cultivated on a premises licensed by the
 Department of Cannabis Control for cannabis cultivation shall be considered cannabis as defined in Section 26001 of the Business and Professions Code and subject to licensing and regulatory requirements for cannabis pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) Industrial hemp shall include products imported under the Harmonized Tariff Schedule of the United States (2013) of the United States International Trade Commission, including, but not limited to, hemp seed, per subheading 1207.99.03, hemp oil, per subheading 1515.90.80, oilcake, per subheading 2306.90.01, true hemp, per heading 5302, true hemp yarn, per subheading 5308.20.00, and woven fabrics of true hemp fibers, per subheading 5311.00.40.

(e) (1) Except when industrial hemp is grown by a registered established agricultural research institution and